Iowa, session 2025-2026, SSB3004.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 5290XC (2) 91 je/js S.F. _____ Section 1. Section 84A.5, Code 2026, is amended by adding 1 the following new subsection: 2 NEW SUBSECTION . 13. The department of workforce 3 development shall establish an online, interactive platform 4 that provides and enhances connections between students and 5 professionals to allow students to virtually explore career 6 options from the classroom. The department shall establish 7 a process for schools to enter into a contract with the 8 department to participate in the platform. The platform shall 9 allow educators at schools that enter into a contract to 10 request online sessions for their classrooms with professionals 11 in industries designated by the educator based on student 12 input. The platform shall match a participating professionalâs 13 background, experience, and skills with classroom and 14 curriculum needs at a participating school. The department 15 may coordinate with other states that have established similar 16 platforms in implementation of the platform. The platform 17 shall include but is not limited to the following functions: 18 a. A means for educators to request a connection to a 19 professional in an industry designated by the educator. 20 b. A means for a professional to search for and accept 21 requested connections. 22 c. A means for a professional to participate in an online 23 session with a connected classroom whereby the professional can 24 share information and answer questions from students about the 25 professionalâs industry. 26 d. An option for a professional or industry association 27 to sponsor the cost, if any, of a contract for a school to 28 participate in the platform. 29 e. A means for classrooms to watch recorded video 30 presentations from industry leaders around the country to learn 31 about careers in a wide variety of fields. 32 f. A means for a professional or industry association to 33 participate in the platform by providing video presentations 34 on their respective profession or industry and assisting in 35 -1- LSB 5290XC (2) 91 je/js 1/ 2 S.F. _____ identifying professionals requested by educators. 1